Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1674.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 70.54 RCW to read as follows:(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, an adult patient who receives primary care services from a health care entity where primary care services are provided shall be offered a hepatitis B screening test and a hepatitis C screening test during an annual physical examination, wellness visit, or the first visit with a provider that is new to the patient based on the latest screening indications recommended by the federal centers for disease control and prevention. A health care entity where primary care services are provided may comply with this subsection by:(a) Offering patients that meet the recommended screening indications a hepatitis B screening test and a hepatitis C screening test during an annual physical examination, wellness visit, or the first visit with a provider that is new to the patient;(b) Incorporating a prompt for hepatitis B screening tests and hepatitis C screening tests for the recommended populations into the health care entity's electronic health record system; or(c) Sending routine mailers or electronic communications to the health care entity's primary care patients that meet the recommended screening indications informing patients of the availability and importance of hepatitis B screening tests and hepatitis C screening tests.(2) A hepatitis B screening test and a hepatitis C screening test are not required to be offered by the health care entity if:(a) The patient is being treated for a life-threatening emergency;(b) The patient has previously been offered or has been the subject of a hepatitis B screening test or a hepatitis C screening test, unless a health care provider within the health care entity determines that one or both of the screening tests should be offered again; or(c) The patient lacks capacity to consent to a hepatitis B screening test or a hepatitis C screening test, or both.(3)(a) If the patient accepts the offer of the hepatitis B screening test and the test is hepatitis B surface antigen positive, the health care provider within the health care entity shall offer the patient follow-up health care or refer the patient to another health care provider who can provide follow-up health care.(b) If a patient accepts the offer of the hepatitis C screening test and the test is positive, the health care provider within the health care entity shall offer the patient follow-up health care or refer the patient to another health care provider who can provide follow-up health care. The follow-up health care shall include a hepatitis C diagnostic test.(4) The offering of a hepatitis B screening test and a hepatitis C screening test under this section must be culturally and linguistically appropriate.(5) By January 1, 2026, health care providers providing primary care services must complete health training modules on hepatitis B and hepatitis C offered online by the University of Washington. Health care providers licensed after January 1, 2026, or new to providing primary care services after that date, must complete the training modules before providing primary care services.(6) This section does not affect the scope of practice of any health care provider or diminish any authority or legal or professional obligation of any health care provider to offer a hepatitis B screening test, hepatitis C screening test, or both, or a hepatitis C diagnostic test, or to provide services or care for the patient of a hepatitis B screening test, hepatitis C screening test, or both, or a hepatitis C diagnostic test.(7) A health care provider or health care entity where primary care services are provided that fails to comply with the requirements of this section shall not be subject to any actions related to their licensure or certification, or to any civil or criminal liability, because of the health care entity's failure to comply with the requirements of this section.(8) The department of health may adopt rules necessary to implement this section and any additional rules involving the offering of screening tests and treatment requirements for hepatitis B and hepatitis C and the training for health care entities and health care providers.(9) For purposes of this section:(a) "Follow-up health care" includes providing medical management and antiviral treatment for chronic hepatitis B or hepatitis C according to the latest national clinical practice guidelines recommended by the American association for the study of liver diseases.(b) "Health care entity where primary care services are provided" means an unlicensed health care clinic, urgent care clinic, and any other health care setting where primary care services are provided.(c) "Hepatitis B screening test" includes any laboratory test or tests that detect the presence of hepatitis B surface antigen and provides confirmation of whether the patient has a chronic hepatitis B infection.(d) "Hepatitis C diagnostic test" includes any laboratory test or tests that detect the presence of the hepatitis C virus in the blood and provides confirmation of whether the patient has an active hepatitis C virus infection.(e) "Hepatitis C screening test" includes any laboratory screening test or tests that detect the presence of hepatitis C virus antibodies in the blood and provides confirmation of whether the patient has ever been infected with the hepatitis C virus.(f) "Primary care services" means routine health care services, including screening, assessment, diagnosis, and treatment for the purpose of promotion of health, and detection and management of disease or injury.--- END ---